Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 38.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,379
Minitrucks; restrictions on use.

(1) A minitruck
shall not be operated on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways,
on expressways, or on freeways.

(2) A minitruck
shall be operated with its headlights and taillights on.

Laws 2010, LB650, § 38.